Massachusetts, session 194th, H449.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 87DDD1/2 of chapter 112 of the General Laws shall be amended by adding the
following paragraphs: -
(b) No licensed real estate broker or other person or entity engaged in the rental or leasing
of residential real estate in the commonwealth as agent of the landowner, landlord, lessor, or sub-
lessor shall demand, receive, or retain any payment, fee, commission or other charge from a
tenant or prospective tenant for any services on behalf of such landowner, landlord, lessor, or
sub-lessor for the listing, showing, qualifying of prospective tenants, preparation and execution
of documents, or otherwise arising out of the leasing of a residential rental.
(c) No landowner, landlord, lessor, or sub-lessor shall demand or require that a tenant or
prospective tenant retain, hire or engage a rental agent or broker and pay such agent or broker a
fee or commission as a condition to applying for or leasing a residential rental unit in the
of 2

commonwealth, and no such landowner, lessor, or sub-lessor shall demand or require that a
tenant or prospective tenant make any payment in violation of subsection (b) of this act.
(d) Violation of this act shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice in the
conduct of a trade or commerce in violation of section 2 of chapter 93A.
(e) There shall be a fine established, for violation of this act, not to exceed $1,000.00 per
violation. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2